Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.210

Authority to enter and inspect nursing home—Advance notice—Defense.

(1) Any duly authorized officer, employee, or agent of the department may enter and inspect any nursing home, including, but not limited to, interviewing residents and reviewing records, at any time to enforce any provision of this chapter. Inspections conducted pursuant to complaints filed with the department shall be conducted in such a manner as to ensure maximum effectiveness. No advance notice shall be given of any inspection conducted pursuant to this chapter unless previously and specifically authorized by the secretary or required by federal law.

(2) Any public employee giving such advance notice in violation of this section shall be suspended from all duties without pay for a period of not less than five nor more than fifteen days.

(3) In any hearing held pursuant to this chapter, it shall be a defense to a violation relating to the standard of care to be afforded public patients to show that the department does not provide reasonable funds to meet the cost of reimbursement standard allegedly violated.

[ 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 22; 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 18.51.010.